District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.16

Cease and desist order.

(a)

The Commissioner may issue and serve upon the financial institution or its affiliate or subsidiary a final cease and desist order if:

(1)

The party served with the notice of charges fails to appear at the hearing called under § 26-551.13; or

(2)

The record of the hearing held under § 26-551.13 supports a finding that the violation or unsafe and unsound practice specified in the notice of charges has occurred or reasonably likely to occur.

(b)

A final cease and desist order may require that a financial institution or a director, officer, trustee, employee, agent, affiliate, or subsidiary of the financial institution:

(1)

Cease and desist from the violation or unsafe or unsound practice or from any activity that will or may result in a violation or unsafe or unsound practice;

(2)

Take affirmative action to correct the violation, unsafe or unsound practice, or condition resulting from the violation or unsafe or unsound practice or to avoid a violation or unsafe or unsound practice; or

(3)

Provide indemnification, reimbursement, restitution, or any other relief that the Commissioner determines is appropriate.

(c)

A final cease and desist order shall become effective 30 days after the service of the order upon the financial institution or its affiliate or subsidiary; provided, that a final cease and desist order which has been issued upon the consent of the Commissioner and a financial institution or other parties shall become effective upon the date specified in the consent order.

(d)

A final cease and desist order shall remain in effect until it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by the Commissioner or a court.

(e)

In addition to, or instead of, issuing a final cease and desist order, the Commissioner may enter into an informal enforcement action, such as a supervisory agreement or memorandum of understanding, with the financial institution.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 116, 48 DCR 3244